src/fst/morphology/incoming/resplit/verb_suffixes.lexc
LEXICON CONJ_VTA_SUFFIXES
! Direct, Singular Subject and Object, CONJUNCTIVE
@R.person.KI@+1Sg+2SgO:@R.person.KI@%>%^VLVohsi   	ENCLITICS ;	
@R.person.NI@+1Sg+3SgO:@R.person.NI@%>%^VLVahsi   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NI@+1Sg+4SgO:@R.person.NI@%>%^VLVahsini   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.KI@+2Sg+3SgO:@R.person.KI@%>%^VLVahsi   		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.KI@+2Sg+4SgO:@R.person.KI@%>%^VLVahsini   		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.OT@+3Sg+4SgO:@R.person.OT@%>%^VLVahsi   		ENCLITICS ;

! Direct, Plural Subject, Singular Object, CONJUNCTIVE
@R.person.KI@+1Pl+2SgO:@R.person.KI@%>%^VLVohsinnaani   		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NI@+1Pl+3SgO:@R.person.NI@%>%^VLVahsinnaani   		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NI@+1Pl+4SgO:@R.person.NI@%>%^VLVahsinnaanini   		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl+3SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^VLVahsi   		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl+4SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^VLVahsini   		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.KI@+2Pl+3SgO:@R.person.KI@%>%^VLVahsoaayi   		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.KI@+2Pl+4SgO:@R.person.KI@%>%^VLVahsoaayini   		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.OT@+3Pl+4SgO:@R.person.OT@%>%^VLVahsi   		ENCLITICS ;

! Direct, Plural Subject and Object, CONJUNCTIVE
@R.person.KI@+1Pl+2PlO:@R.person.KI@%>%^VLVohsinnaani   		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NI@+1Pl+3PlO:@R.person.NI@%>%^VLVahsinnaani   		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NI@+1Pl+4PlO:@R.person.NI@%>%^VLVahsinnaani   		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl+3PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^VLVahsi   		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl+4PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^VLVahsi   		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.KI@+2Pl+3PlO:@R.person.KI@%>%^VLVahsoaayi   		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.KI@+2Pl+4PlO:@R.person.KI@%>%^VLVahsoaayi   		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.OT@+3Pl+4PlO:@R.person.OT@%>%^VLVahsi   		ENCLITICS ;

! Direct, Singular Subject, Plural Object, CONJUNCTIVE
@R.person.KI@+1Sg+2PlO:@R.person.KI@%>%^VLVohsoaayi   		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NI@+1Sg+3PlO:@R.person.NI@%>%^VLVahsi   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NI@+1Sg+4PlO:@R.person.NI@%>%^VLVahsi   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.KI@+2Sg+3PlO:@R.person.KI@%>%^VLVahsi   		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.KI@+2Sg+4PlO:@R.person.KI@%>%^VLVahsi   		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.OT@+3Sg+4PlO:@R.person.OT@%>%^VLVahsi   		ENCLITICS ;

! Inverse, Singular Subject and Object, CONJUNCTIVE
@R.person.KI@+2Sg+1SgO:@R.person.KI@%>%^INVokssi   	ENCLITICS ;	
@R.person.KI@+3Sg+2SgO:@R.person.KI@%>yssi   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NI@+3Sg+1SgO:@R.person.NI@%>yssi   		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.OT@+4Sg+3SgO:@R.person.OT@%>yssi   		ENCLITICS ;

! Inverse, Plural Subject and Singular Object, CONJUNCTIVE
@R.person.KI@+2Pl+1SgO:@R.person.KI@%>%^INVokssoaayi   	ENCLITICS ;	
@R.person.NI@+3Pl+1SgO:@R.person.NI@%>yssinnaani   		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.KI@+3Pl+2SgO:@R.person.KI@%>yssi   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.OT@+4Pl+3SgO:@R.person.OT@%>yssi   		ENCLITICS ;

! Inverse, Plural Subject and Object, CONJUNCTIVE
@R.person.KI@+2Pl+1PlO:@R.person.KI@%>%^INVokssinnaani   	ENCLITICS ;	
@R.person.KI@+3Pl+2PlO:@R.person.KI@%>yssoaayi   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NI@+3Pl+21PlO:@R.person.NI@%>%^INVokssi   		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NI@+3Pl+1PlO:@R.person.NI@%>yssinnaani   		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.OT@+4Pl+3PlO:@R.person.OT@%>yssi   		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.OT@+4Pl+4PlO:@R.person.OT@%>yssi   		ENCLITICS ;

! Inverse, Singular Subject and Plural Object, CONJUNCTIVE
@R.person.KI@+2Sg+1PlO:@R.person.KI@%>%^INVokssinnaani   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NI@+3Sg+1PlO:@R.person.NI@%>yssinnaani   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.KI@+3Sg+2PlO:@R.person.KI@%>yssoaayi   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.OT@+3Sg+21PlO:@R.person.OT@%>%^INVokssi      	ENCLITICS ; ! KS changed to 21
@R.person.OT@+4Sg+3PlO:@R.person.OT@%>yssi   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.OT@+4Sg+4PlO:@R.person.OT@%>yssi   	ENCLITICS ;

! Unspecified Subject, Conjunctive
@R.person.NI@+Unspec+1SgO:@R.person.NI@%>%^INVokoohsi   	ENCLITICS ;	
@R.person.NI@+Unspec+1PlO:@R.person.NI@%>%^INVotssinnaani   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.KI@+Unspec+2SgO:@R.person.KI@%>%^INVokoohsi   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.KI@+Unspec+2PlO:@R.person.KI@%>%^INVotssoaayi   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+Unspec+21PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^INVotssi   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+Unspec+3SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^VLVahsi   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+Unspec+3PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^VLVahsi   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+Unspec+4SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^VLVahsini   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+Unspec+4PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^VLVahsi   	ENCLITICS ;

LEXICON SUBJ_VTA_SUFFIXES
! Direct, Singular Subject and Object, SUBJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NULL@+1Sg+2SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>iniki   	ENCLITICS ;	
@R.person.NULL@+1Sg+3SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^VLVainiki   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+2Sg+3SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^VLVainiki   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg+4SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^VLVasi   	ENCLITICS ;	

! Direct, Plural Subject, Singular Object, SUBJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NULL@+1Pl+2SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>innaaniki   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+1Pl+3SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^VLVainnaaniki   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+2Pl+3SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^VLVainoainiki   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl+3SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^VLVahki   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Pl+4SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^VLVasi   	ENCLITICS ;	

! Direct, Plural Subject and Object, SUBJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NULL@+1Pl+2PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>innaaniki   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+1Pl+3PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^VLVainnaaniki   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+2Pl+3PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^VLVainainiki   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl+3PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^VLVahki   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Pl+4PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^VLVasi   	ENCLITICS ;	

! Direct, Singular Subject, Plural Object, SUBJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NULL@+1Sg+2PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>inoainiki   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+1Sg+3PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^VLVainiki   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+2Sg+3PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^VLVainiki   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg+4PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^VLVasi 	ENCLITICS ;	

! Inverse, Singular Subject and Object, SUBJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NULL@+2Sg+1SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^INVokiiniki   	ENCLITICS ;	
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg+1SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^INVotsiiniki   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg+2SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^INVotsiiniki   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Sg+3SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^INVotsiiniki   	ENCLITICS ;

! Inverse, Plural Subject and Singular Object, SUBJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NULL@+2Pl+1SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^INVokiinoainiki   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Pl+1SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^INVotsiiniki   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Pl+2SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^INVotsiiniki   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Pl+3SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^INVotsiiniki   	ENCLITICS ;

! Inverse, Plural Subject and Object, SUBJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NULL@+2Pl+1PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^INVokinnaaniki   	ENCLITICS ;	
@R.person.NULL@+3Pl+2PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^INVotsiinoainiki   	ENCLITICS ;
!@R.person.NULL@+3Pl+2PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^INVotsiinoainiki   	ENCLITICS ; ! repeat line
@R.person.NULL@+3Pl+1PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^INVotsiinnaaniki   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Pl+21PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^INVokisi   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Pl+3PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^INVotsiinoainiki   	ENCLITICS ;

! Inverse, Singular Subject and Plural Object, CONJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NULL@+2Sg+1PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^INVokinnaaniki   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg+1PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^INVotsiinnaaniki   	ENCLITICS ;	
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg+2PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^INVotsiinoainiki  	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg+21PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^INVokisi   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Sg+3PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^INVotsiinoainiki   	ENCLITICS ;

! Unspecified Subject, SUBJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NULL@+Unspec+1SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^INVokoiniki   	ENCLITICS ;	
@R.person.NULL@+Unspec+1PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^INVokoinnaaniki   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+Unspec+2SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^INVokoiniki   	ENCLITICS ;	
@R.person.NULL@+Unspec+2PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^INVokoinoainiki		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+Unspec+21PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^INVotsski   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+Unspec+3SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^VLVahki   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+Unspec+3PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^VLVahki   	ENCLITICS ;

LEXICON IMP_VTA_SUFFIXES
! Singular IMPERATIVE
@R.person.IMP@+2Sg+1SgO:@R.person.IMP@%>%^INVokit         ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.IMP@+2Sg+1PlO:@R.person.IMP@%>%^INVokinnaana ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.IMP@+2Sg+3SgO:@R.person.IMP@%>%^IMPis        ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.IMP@+2Sg+3PlO:@R.person.IMP@%>%^IMPis        ENCLITICS ;
! Plural IMPERATIVE
@R.person.IMP@+2Pl+1SgO:@R.person.IMP@%>%^INVokik      ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.IMP@+2Pl+1PlO:@R.person.IMP@%>%^INVokinnaana ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.IMP@+2Pl+3SgO:@R.person.IMP@%>%^IMPok        ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.IMP@+2Pl+3PlO:@R.person.IMP@%>%^IMPok        ENCLITICS ;

! The following lexicons contain the suffixes used to formulate questions. Otherwise called interrogatives.
! For more information, see Frantz 2017 Chapter 21.

LEXICON ANIM_INTERR
0 # ;
+Interr:%>hpa # ;

! The following lexicon contains the enclitic pronouns or attached pronouns from Frantz 2017 Chapter 9
! Using the term D3Sg follows Frantz in distinguishing between the 3rd person pronoun used when there
! is only one argument (Distinct third person singular), and just the regular 3rd person pronoun.
! They are not marked as subject or object because they can be either.
! This lexicon goes to a bound lexicon which does not count the number of enclitics, but allows the model to add 1-2 
! cliticized pronouns.

LEXICON ENCLITICS
0 # ;
+PRO+3/%0Pl:%>aawa ENCLITICS_BOUND ;
+PRO+D3Pl:%>%^PROaiksi ENCLITICS_BOUND ;
+PRO+D3Sg:%>%^PROáyi ENCLITICS_BOUND ;
+PRO+D%0Pl:%>%^PROaistsi ENCLITICS_BOUND ;

LEXICON ENCLITICS_BOUND
0 # ;
+PRO+3/%0Pl:%>aawa # ;
+PRO+D3Pl:%>aiksi # ;
+PRO+D3Sg:%>áyi # ;
+PRO+D%0Pl:%>aistsi # ;

LEXICON VERB_DER_NOM_SUFFIXES
+Der/Nom:0                     NOUN_SUFFIXES "weight: 10" ;
+Der/Nom2:%>n                  NOUN_SUFFIXES "weight: 10" ;
+Der/Nom3:%>i2hsin             NOUN_SUFFIXES "weight: 10" ;
+Der/Nom4:%>hp                 NOUN_SUFFIXES "weight: 10" ;
+Der/Nom5:%>o'p                NOUN_SUFFIXES "weight: 10" ;

! Below is the set of verb suffixes that occur when a noun undergoes the verbalization process. (aakiiyiwa 'she is a woman').
! They are only instransitive verbs. Some things to note. I have only included the person suffixes, not the derivational suffixes.
! This verb paradigm does not include dependent nouns.

LEXICON N_VAI_SUFFIXES !! [OLD: VAI_SUFFIXES]
@R.mode.IND@+Ind:@R.mode.IND@ N_INDEP_VAI_SUFFIXES ; !! [OLD: INDEP_VAI_SUFFIXES]
@R.mode.CON@+Cnj:@R.mode.CON@ N_CONJ_VAI_SUFFIXES ; !! [OLD: CONJ_VAI_SUFFIXES]
@R.mode.SUB@+Sbj:@R.mode.SUB@ N_SUBJ_VAI_SUFFIXES ; !! [OLD: SUBJ_VAI_SUFFIXES]
@R.mode.IRR@+Irr:@R.mode.IRR@ N_UNREAL_VAI_SUFFIXES ; !! [OLD: UNREAL_VAI_SUFFIXES]
@R.mode.IMP@+Imp:@R.mode.IMP@ N_IMP_VAI_SUFFIXES ; !! [OLD: IMP_VAI_SUFFIXES]

LEXICON N_INDEP_VAI_SUFFIXES !! [OLD: INDEP_VAI_SUFFIXES]
! Third Person Interrogatives
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg+Interr:@R.person.NULL@%>waatsiksi # ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Pl+Interr:@R.person.NULL@%>waiksaawa # ;
! Singular INDEPENDENT
@R.person.NI@+1Sg:@R.person.NI@%>yi N_ANIM_INTERR ; !! [OLD: ANIM_INTERR]
@R.person.KI@+2Sg:@R.person.KI@%>yi N_ANIM_INTERR ; !! [OLD: ANIM_INTERR]
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>wa N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.NULL@+4Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>yini N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
! Plural INDEPENDENT
@R.person.NI@+1Pl:@R.person.NI@%>yihpinnaana N_ANIM_INTERR ; !! [OLD: ANIM_INTERR]
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yio'pa N_ANIM_INTERR ; !! [OLD: ANIM_INTERR]
@R.person.KI@+2Pl:@R.person.KI@%>yihpoaawa N_ANIM_INTERR ; !! [OLD: ANIM_INTERR]
@R.person.NULL@+3Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.NULL@+4Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
